data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.aff
SFX i   0        íeis         ucar
SFX i   0        mos          ucar
SFX i   ucar     úcas         ucar
SFX i   r        sse          ucar
SFX i   ar       ásseis       ucar
SFX i   r        ssem         ucar
SFX i   ar       ássemos      ucar
SFX i   r        sses         ucar
SFX i   r        ste          ucar
SFX i   r        stes         ucar
SFX i   r        va           ucar
SFX i   r        vam          ucar
SFX i   ar       ávamos       ucar
SFX i   r        vas          ucar
SFX i   ar       áveis        ucar
SFX i   ucar     úco          ucar
SFX i   ar       ou           ucar
SFX i   ucar     úque         ucar
SFX i   car      quei         ucar
SFX i   car      queis        ucar
SFX i   ucar     úquem        ucar
SFX i   car      quemos       ucar
SFX i   ucar     úques        ucar
SFX i   inar     ína          [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        da           [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        das          [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        do           [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        dos          [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        i            [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        is           [aeu]inar
SFX i   inar     ínam         [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        mos          [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        ndo          [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        a            [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        á            [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        am           [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       áramos       [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        ão           [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        as           [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        ás           [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        des          [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        ei           [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        eis          [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       áreis        [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        em           [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        emos         [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        es           [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        ia           [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        iam          [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        íamos        [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        ias          [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        íeis         [aeu]inar
SFX i   0        mos          [aeu]inar
SFX i   inar     ínas         [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        sse          [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       ásseis       [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        ssem         [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       ássemos      [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        sses         [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        ste          [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        stes         [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        va           [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        vam          [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       ávamos       [aeu]inar
SFX i   r        vas          [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       áveis        [aeu]inar
SFX i   inar     íne          [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       ei           [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       eis          [aeu]inar
SFX i   inar     ínem         [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       emos         [aeu]inar
SFX i   inar     ínes         [aeu]inar
SFX i   inar     íno          [aeu]inar
SFX i   ar       ou           [aeu]inar
SFX i   ir       e            cernir
SFX i   ir       em           cernir
SFX i   ir       es           cernir
SFX i   r        0            cernir
SFX i   r        a            cernir
SFX i   r        am           cernir
SFX i   ir       íamos        cernir
SFX i   r        as           cernir
SFX i   r        da           cernir
SFX i   r        das          cernir
SFX i   r        do           cernir
SFX i   r        dos          cernir
SFX i   ir       íeis         cernir
SFX i   r        mos          cernir
SFX i   r        ndo          cernir
SFX i   0        a            cernir
SFX i   0        á            cernir
SFX i   0        am           cernir
SFX i   ir       íramos       cernir
SFX i   0        ão           cernir
SFX i   0        as           cernir
SFX i   0        ás           cernir
SFX i   0        des          cernir
SFX i   0        ei           cernir
SFX i   0        eis          cernir
SFX i   ir       íreis        cernir
SFX i   0        em           cernir
SFX i   0        emos         cernir
SFX i   0        es           cernir
SFX i   0        ia           cernir
SFX i   0        iam          cernir
SFX i   0        íamos        cernir
SFX i   0        ias          cernir
SFX i   0        íeis         cernir
SFX i   0        mos          cernir
SFX i   r        s            cernir
SFX i   r        sse          cernir
SFX i   ir       ísseis       cernir
SFX i   r        ssem         cernir
SFX i   ir       íssemos      cernir
SFX i   r        sses         cernir
SFX i   r        ste          cernir
SFX i   r        stes         cernir
SFX i   r        u            cernir
SFX i   ernir    irna         cernir
SFX i   ernir    irnais       cernir
SFX i   ernir    irnam        cernir
SFX i   ernir    irnamos      cernir
SFX i   ernir    irnas        cernir
SFX i   ernir    irno         cernir
SFX i   ir       e            dormir
SFX i   ir       em           dormir
SFX i   ir       es           dormir
SFX i   r        0            dormir
SFX i   r        a            dormir
SFX i   r        am           dormir
SFX i   ir       íamos        dormir
SFX i   r        as           dormir
SFX i   r        da           dormir
SFX i   r        das          dormir
SFX i   r        do           dormir
SFX i   r        dos          dormir
SFX i   ir       íeis         dormir
SFX i   r        mos          dormir
SFX i   r        ndo          dormir
SFX i   0        a            dormir
SFX i   0        á            dormir
SFX i   0        am           dormir
SFX i   ir       íramos       dormir
SFX i   0        ão           dormir
SFX i   0        as           dormir
SFX i   0        ás           dormir
SFX i   0        des          dormir
SFX i   0        ei           dormir
SFX i   0        eis          dormir
SFX i   ir       íreis        dormir
SFX i   0        em           dormir
SFX i   0        emos         dormir
SFX i   0        es           dormir
SFX i   0        ia           dormir
SFX i   0        iam          dormir
SFX i   0        íamos        dormir
SFX i   0        ias          dormir
SFX i   0        íeis         dormir
SFX i   0        mos          dormir
SFX i   r        s            dormir
SFX i   r        sse          dormir
SFX i   ir       ísseis       dormir
SFX i   r        ssem         dormir
SFX i   ir       íssemos      dormir
SFX i   r        sses         dormir
SFX i   r        ste          dormir
SFX i   r        stes         dormir
SFX i   r        u            dormir
SFX i   ormir    urma         dormir
SFX i   ormir    urmais       dormir
SFX i   ormir    urmam        dormir
SFX i   ormir    urmamos      dormir
SFX i   ormir    urmas        dormir
SFX i   ormir    urmo         dormir
SFX i   ugir     oge          fugir
SFX i   ugir     ogem         fugir
SFX i   ugir     oges         fugir
SFX i   r        0            fugir
SFX i   r        a            fugir
SFX i   r        am           fugir
SFX i   ir       íamos        fugir
SFX i   r        as           fugir
SFX i   r        da           fugir
SFX i   r        das          fugir
SFX i   r        do           fugir
SFX i   r        dos          fugir
SFX i   ir       íeis         fugir
SFX i   r        mos          fugir
SFX i   r        ndo          fugir
SFX i   0        a            fugir
SFX i   0        á            fugir
SFX i   0        am           fugir
SFX i   ir       íramos       fugir
SFX i   0        ão           fugir
SFX i   0        as           fugir
SFX i   0        ás           fugir
SFX i   0        des          fugir
SFX i   0        ei           fugir
SFX i   0        eis          fugir
SFX i   ir       íreis        fugir
SFX i   0        em           fugir
SFX i   0        emos         fugir
SFX i   0        es           fugir
SFX i   0        ia           fugir
SFX i   0        iam          fugir
SFX i   0        íamos        fugir
SFX i   0        ias          fugir
SFX i   0        íeis         fugir
SFX i   0        mos          fugir
SFX i   r        s            fugir
SFX i   r        sse          fugir
SFX i   ir       ísseis       fugir
SFX i   r        ssem         fugir
SFX i   ir       íssemos      fugir
