data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.dic
abaiucar/isYMjL
abstruir/isjL
absumir/isj
arruinar/isYMjL
aspergir/isMjL
atupir/isMjÂ
branquir/isjL
cafeinar/isYjLÂ
concernir/isj
confugir/isMjL
construir/isjLÂÀ
consumir/isjÈ
convergir/isMjL
crer/isMjLÂÄ
crespir/isMjL
deceinar/isYMjL
demulcir/isjL
despir/isMjL
destruir/isjLÃ
divergir/isMjL
dormir/isMjLÄò
encrupir/isMjÂ
engrupir/isMjL
entreunir/isMjL
entupir/isMjLÂ
escupir/isMjÂ
estruir/isjL
estrupir/isMjÂ
extorquir/isjL
fugir/isMjLÀî
gauchar/isYMjLò
mançupir/isMjÂ
mansupir/isMjÂ
ressequir/isjL
retorquir/isjL
reunir/isMjL
subterfugir/isMjL
sumir/isMjLÂÄÀÈ
trazer/isMjLÀ
trupir/isMjÂ
tupir/isMjÂ
vir/isjÀ
